Washington statutes.
RCW 40.06.030

Deposits by state agencies—Exemptions.

(1) Every state agency shall promptly submit to the state library copies of published information that are state publications.

(a) For state publications available only in print format, each state agency shall deposit, at a minimum, two copies of each of its publications with the state library. For the purposes of broad public access, state agencies may deposit additional copies with the state library for distribution to additional depository libraries.

(b) For state publications available only in electronic format, each state agency shall deposit one copy of each of its publications with the state library.

(c) For state publications available in both print and electronic format, each state agency shall deposit two print copies and one electronic copy of the publication with the state library.

(2) Annually, each state agency shall provide the state library with a listing of all its publications made available to state government and the public during the preceding year, including those published in electronic form. The secretary of state shall, by rule, establish the annual date by which state agencies must provide the list of its publications to the state library.

(3) In the interest of economy and efficiency, the state librarian may specifically or by general rule exempt a given state publication or class of publications from the requirements of this section in full or in part.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 304; 2006 c 199 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 10; 1963 c 233 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Findings—2006 c 199: See note following RCW 27.04.045.